Utah, session 2026, HB364.
Section 1. Section 53G-11-210 is enacted to read:53G-11-210. Certified teacher librarian.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Certified teacher librarian" means a full-time employee of a school district or regional education service agency, who:(i)oversees and works to improve the curation and development of a library collection within a:(A)school district; or(B)regional education service agency;(ii)works to improve student academic achievement in reading and other content areas;(iii)assists a school with navigating the sensitive material requirements described in Section 53G-10-103;(iv)develops curricula and best practices for teaching state standards regarding library media;(v)facilitates collaboration between teachers and school librarians to support student academic achievement; and(vi)provides professional learning and mentoring to teachers and school librarians, including:(A)core library practices and operations;(B)research backed best practices for instruction and student engagement;(C)research backed best practices for promotion of literacy and reading motivation;(D)integration of information literacy, news literacy, media literacy, and digital literacy across all content areas; and(E)library technology and systems.(b)"Regional education service agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-4-410.(2)Before July 1, 2031, each school district shall staff a full-time certified teacher librarian at:(a)the school district; or(b)the school district's regional education service agency.(3)The state board shall:(a)subject to legislative appropriations, distribute funds to a school district or regional education service agency to staff a full-time certified teacher librarian, in accordance with Subsection (2); and(b)make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish:(i)minimum qualifications; or(ii)licensure requirements for a certified teacher librarian.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.